Tennessee, session 114, HB0513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-3-142, is amended by deleting the
language "January 31" wherever it appears in subsections (a), (b), and (d) and substituting
"February 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0513
000281
- 1 -